Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-1401.40
Wrecker or salvage dealer, defined.

Wrecker or salvage
dealer means any person who acquires one or more motor vehicles or trailers
for the purpose of dismantling them for the purpose of reselling the parts
or reselling the vehicles as scrap.

Laws 2010, LB816, § 52.